Hawaii statutes.
[§487-1] Legislative intent. The
public health, welfare and interest require a strong and effective consumer
protection program to protect the interests of both the consumer public and the
legitimate business person. Toward this end, a permanent office of consumer
protection is created to coordinate the services offered to the consumer by
various state and county agencies, together with private organizations, and to
aid in the development of preventive and remedial programs affecting the
interest of the consumer public. [L 1969, c 175, §1; gen ch 1993]

Case Notes

A duty of care may be established by statute if a legislative
enactment lays down requirements of conduct, and provides expressly or by
implication that a violation shall entail civil liability in tort; as this
section states the purpose behind the creation of an office of consumer
protection but does not provide any standard governing conduct or any provision
which prescribes a duty, this section does not create nor is indicative of a
standard of care in a claim for negligence. 128 H. 423, 290 P.3d 493 (2012).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next